Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.395

Format and style of amendatory and new sections—Failure to comply.

(1) Rules proposed or adopted by an agency pursuant to this chapter that amend existing sections of the administrative code shall have the words which are amendatory to such existing sections underlined. Any matter to be deleted from an existing section shall be indicated by setting such matter forth in full, enclosed by double parentheses, and such deleted matter shall be lined out with hyphens. A new section shall be designated "NEW SECTION" in upper case type and such designation shall be underlined, but the complete text of the section shall not be underlined. No rule may be forwarded by any agency to the code reviser, nor may the code reviser accept for filing any rule unless the format of such rule is in compliance with the provisions of this section.

(2) Once the rule has been formally adopted by the agency the code reviser need not, except with regard to the register published pursuant to RCW 34.05.210(3), include the items enumerated in subsection (1) of this section in the official code.

(3) Any addition to or deletion from an existing code section not filed by the agency in the style prescribed by subsection (1) of this section shall in all respects be ineffectual, and shall not be shown in subsequent publications or codifications of that section unless the ineffectual portion of the rule is clearly distinguished and an explanatory note is appended thereto by the code reviser in accordance with RCW 34.05.210.

[ 1988 c 288 s 318; 1980 c 186 s 14; 1977 c 19 s 1. Formerly RCW 34.04.058.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 186: See note following RCW 34.05.320.